Washington statutes.
RCW 10.40.200

Deportation of aliens upon conviction—Advisement—Legislative intent.

(1) The legislature finds and declares that in many instances involving an individual who is not a citizen of the United States charged with an offense punishable as a crime under state law, a plea of guilty is entered without the defendant knowing that a conviction of such offense is grounds for deportation, exclusion from admission to the United States, or denial of naturalization pursuant to the laws of the United States. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature in enacting this section to promote fairness to such accused individuals by requiring in such cases that acceptance of a guilty plea be preceded by an appropriate warning of the special consequences for such a defendant which may result from the plea. It is further the intent of the legislature that at the time of the plea no defendant be required to disclose his or her legal status to the court.

(2) Prior to acceptance of a plea of guilty to any offense punishable as a crime under state law, except offenses designated as infractions under state law, the court shall determine that the defendant has been advised of the following potential consequences of conviction for a defendant who is not a citizen of the United States: Deportation, exclusion from admission to the United States, or denial of naturalization pursuant to the laws of the United States. A defendant signing a guilty plea statement containing the advisement required by this subsection shall be presumed to have received the required advisement. If, after September 1, 1983, the defendant has not been advised as required by this section and the defendant shows that conviction of the offense to which the defendant pleaded guilty may have the consequences for the defendant of deportation, exclusion from admission to the United States, or denial of naturalization pursuant to the laws of the United States, the court, on defendant's motion, shall vacate the judgment and permit the defendant to withdraw the plea of guilty and enter a plea of not guilty. Absent a written acknowledgment by the defendant of the advisement required by this subsection, the defendant shall be presumed not to have received the required advisement.

(3) With respect to pleas accepted prior to September 1, 1983, it is not the intent of the legislature that a defendant's failure to receive the advisement required by subsection (2) of this section should require the vacation of judgment and withdrawal of the plea or constitute grounds for finding a prior conviction invalid.

[ 1983 c 199 s 1.]

NOTES:

Notice to courts—Rules—Forms: "The administrative office of the courts shall notify all courts of the requirements contained in RCW 10.40.200. The judicial council shall recommend to the supreme court appropriate court rules to ensure compliance with the requirements of RCW 10.40.200. Until court rules are promulgated, the administrative office of the courts shall develop and distribute forms necessary for the courts to comply with RCW 10.40.200." [ 2005 c 282 s 21; 1983 c 199 s 2.]

Effective date—1983 c 199 s 1: "Section 1 of this act shall take effect on September 1, 1983." [ 1983 c 199 s 3.]